Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2704.10
Prepared food and food and food ingredients; fees and admissions; exemption.

Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of:

(1) Prepared food and food and food ingredients served by public or private schools, school districts, student organizations, or parent-teacher associations pursuant to an agreement with the proper school authorities, in an elementary or secondary school or at any institution of higher education, public or private, during the regular school day or at an approved function of any such school or institution. This exemption does not apply to sales by an institution of higher education at any facility or function which is open to the general public;

(2) Prepared food and food and food ingredients sold by a church at a function of such church;

(3) Prepared food and food and food ingredients served to patients and inmates of hospitals and other institutions licensed by the state for the care of human beings;

(4) Fees and admissions charged for political events by ballot question committees, candidate committees, independent committees, and political party committees as defined in the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act;

(5) Prepared food and food and food ingredients sold to the elderly, handicapped, or recipients of Supplemental Security Income by an organization that actually accepts electronic benefits transfer under regulations issued by the United States Department of Agriculture although it is not necessary for the purchaser to use electronic benefits transfer to pay for the prepared food and food and food ingredients;

(6) Fees and admissions charged by a public or private elementary or secondary school and fees and admissions charged by a school district, student organization, or parent-teacher association, pursuant to an agreement with the proper school authorities, in a public or private elementary or secondary school during the regular school day or at an approved function of any such school;

(7) Fees and admissions charged for participants in any activity provided by a nonprofit organization that is exempt from income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, which organization conducts statewide sport events with multiple sports for both adults and youth; and

(8) Fees and admissions charged for participants in any activity provided by a nonprofit organization that is exempt from income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, which organization is affiliated with a national organization, primarily dedicated to youth development and healthy living, and offers sports instruction and sports leagues or sports events in multiple sports.

Laws 1992, LB 871, § 34;

Laws 1993, LB 345, § 40;

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 54;

Laws 2011, LB211, § 5;

Laws 2012, LB727, § 39;

Laws 2017, LB63, § 1.

Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act, see section 49-1401.